apertium-eo-en.en.dix
<pardef n="probj__prn">
<e>                           <p><l>me</l>                  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>you</l>                 <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>him</l>                 <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>her</l>                 <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>it</l>                  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>us</l>                  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>them</l>                <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="probj_dem__prn_not_empty">
<e>                           <p><l><b/></l>                <r><j/></r></p><par n="probj__prn"/></e>
<!-- la supra linio faras:
<e>                           <p><l><b/>me</l>              <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>you</l>             <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>him</l>             <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>her</l>             <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>it</l>              <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>us</l>              <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>them</l>            <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
-->
<e>                           <p><l><b/>this</l>            <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>these</l>           <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>that</l>            <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l><b/>those</l>           <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="probj_dem__prn">
<e>                           <i></i></e>
<e>                           <i></i><par n="probj_dem__prn_not_empty"/></e>
</pardef>



<!-- ****************** NOVAJ PARDEF'oj ************   - Aldonoj Jacob 2009/03/06
     XXXXX TODO: Uzi la ekzistantaj pardef'oj.     
     -->


<!--
Uzataj estas: 
ag/eing__n
ago__adv
alumn/us__n
armo/ured__adj
ascend/ancy__n
ass__n
ax/e__n
ban__vblex
b/are__vblex
bas/is__n
/be__vblex
b/y__adv
ca__adj
che/quebook__n
criss/-cross__vblex
dat/um__n
dict/um__n
di/e__vblex
down__vblex
drip__vblex
elite__n
favo/ur__n
fib/re__n
ficus__n
fr/y__n
fuel__vblex
grandchild__n
grip/e__vblex
gruel/ling__adj
hal/f__n
hepatiti/s__n
hipp/ie__n
hit__vblex
h/old__vblex
hoo/f__n
hug__vblex
ic/y__adv
ii__adv
jar__vblex
jewel/ler__n
jut__vblex
kid__vblex
labo/urer__n
li/fe__n
lir/a__n
localit/y__n
m/an__n
meag/re__adj
medal/list__n
mix__vblex
mo/uldy__adj
mumm/y__n
ok/ay__adv
out-trade__vblex
ox__n
panic__vblex
patrol__vblex
pcs__n
phon/ey__adj
plug__vblex
pl/y__vblex
p.m__n
prod__vblex
quit__vblex
ram__vblex
r/ide__vblex
rumo/ur__n
salespe/rson__n
s/ceptical__adj
s/ee__vblex
slid/e__vblex
so__adv
sob__vblex
spokespe/rson__n
stri/fe__n
stun__vblex
temp/o__n
thin__vblex
tip__vblex
to/y__n
trot__vblex
up__n
up__pr
up__vblex
v/ie__vblex
vow__vblex
vu__n
wag/gon__n
wed__vblex
whir__vblex
wr/ing__vblex
yen__n
zero__n
zig-zag__vblex
-->

<pardef n="ic/y__adv">
<e>                           <p><l>y</l>                 <r>y<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>ily</l>               <r>y<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="so__adv">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="electrochemical/s__n">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="counsel/lor__n">
<e>                           <p><l>ors</l>                 <r>lor<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>or</l>                  <r>lor<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="thin__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ning</l>                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ned</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ned</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ban__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ning</l>                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ned</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ned</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pcs__n">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="slim__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ming</l>                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>med</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>med</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="r/ing__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>inging</l>              <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ang</l>                 <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ung</l>                 <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ings</l>                <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="arrears">              <i>arrears</i><par n="pcs__n"/></e>
<e lm="can">                  <i>can</i><par n="ban__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="chronically">          <i>chronically</i><par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="coli">                 <i>coli</i><par n="pcs__n"/></e>
<e lm="con">                  <i>con</i><par n="ban__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="don">                  <i>don</i><par n="ban__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="duly">                 <i>duly</i><par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="emergency">            <i>emergenc</i><par n="ic/y__adv"/></e>
<e lm="fiberglass">           <i>fiberglass</i><par n="pcs__n"/></e>
<e lm="fumes">                <i>fumes</i><par n="pcs__n"/></e>
<e lm="godly">                <i>godl</i><par n="ic/y__adv"/></e>
<e lm="halfway">              <i>halfwa</i><par n="ic/y__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ineffably">            <i>ineffably</i><par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="loverly">              <i>loverl</i><par n="ic/y__adv"/></e>
<e lm="man">                  <i>man</i><par n="ban__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mathematically">       <i>mathematically</i><par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="memorabilia">          <i>memorabilia</i><par n="pcs__n"/></e>
<e lm="pan">                  <i>pan</i><par n="ban__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="plausibly">            <i>plausibly</i><par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ravages">              <i>ravages</i><par n="pcs__n"/></e>
<e lm="shitty">               <i>shitt</i><par n="ic/y__adv"/></e>
<e lm="supremely">            <i>supremely</i><par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="tan">                  <i>tan</i><par n="ban__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="thin">                 <i>thin</i><par n="thin__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trusty">               <i>trust</i><par n="ic/y__adv"/></e>
<e lm="underclass">           <i>underclass</i><par n="pcs__n"/></e>
<e lm="unsanitary">           <i>unsanitar</i><par n="ic/y__adv"/></e>
<e lm="verbatim">             <i>verbatim</i><par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="windy">                <i>wind</i><par n="ic/y__adv"/></e>
<e>                           <i></i><par n="probj__prn"/></e>
<e lm="check out">            <i>check</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="pick up">              <i>pick</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="sing">                 <i>s</i><par n="r/ing__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="set about">            <i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>about</l><r><g><b/>about</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="shut down">            <i>shut</i><par n="cut__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="sling">                <i>sl</i><par n="r/ing__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spring">               <i>spr</i><par n="r/ing__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="turn off">             <i>turn</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>off</l><r><g><b/>off</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="give up">              <i>g</i><par n="g/ive__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="wake PRN up">          <i>w</i><par n="w/ake__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn_not_empty"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g>PRN<b/>up</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="get PRN up">          <i>w</i><par n="g/et__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn_not_empty"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g>PRN<b/>up</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="get PRN back">          <i>w</i><par n="g/et__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn_not_empty"/><p><l><b/>back</l><r><g>PRN<b/>back</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="get back out">              <i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>back<b/>out</l><r><g><b/>back<b/>out</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="get PRN up">          <i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn_not_empty"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g>PRN<b/>up</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="get PRN back">          <i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn_not_empty"/><p><l><b/>back</l><r><g>PRN<b/>back</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="get back out">          <i>g</i><par n="g/et__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>back<b/>out</l><r><g><b/>back<b/>out</g></r></p></e>
